Maine, session 132, LD731.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4357-B is enacted to read:
§4357-B. Homeless shelters
1. Definition. As used in this section, "homeless shelter" means a housing facility,
the primary purpose of which is to provide temporary overnight accommodations to
persons experiencing homelessness who are guests in either a dormitory-style or dwelling-
unit-style arrangement or any combination of such arrangements.
2. Homeless shelters may not be prohibited. A municipality may not prohibit
homeless shelters in the municipality. This prohibition does not limit a municipality's home
rule authority to reasonably regulate homeless shelters.
Page 1 - 132LR1340(03)